Illinois, session 104th, HB3398.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by adding 5Section 8-513 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/8-513 new)7    Sec. 8-513. Date of receipt of payments.8    (a) On and after the effective date of this amendatory Act 9of the 104th General Assembly, the date of receipt for a 10payment for a utility bill or invoice shall be the date a 11payment or payment instrument is presented to or arrives at 12the utility or its agent or vendor or the date the mailed 13payment or payment instrument is postmarked.14    (b) The Commission may adopt rules to implement this 15Section.